Utah statutes.
16-6a-705.   Waiver of notice.
(1) (a)  A member may waive any notice required by this chapter or by the
bylaws, whether before or after the date or time stated in the notice as the
date or time when any action will occur or has occurred.
(b)  A waiver described in Subsection (1) shall be:
(i)  in writing;
(ii)  signed by the member entitled to the notice; and
(iii)  delivered to the nonprofit corporation for:
(A)  inclusion in the minutes; or
(B)  filing with the corporate records.
(c)  The delivery and filing required under Subsection (1)(b) may not be
conditions of the effectiveness of the waiver.
(2)  A member's attendance at a meeting:
(a)  waives objection to lack of notice or defective notice of the meeting,
unless the member at the beginning of the meeting objects to holding the
meeting or transacting business at the meeting because of lack of notice or
defective notice; and
(b)  waives objection to consideration of a particular matter at the meeting
that is not within the purpose or purposes described in the meeting notice,
unless the member objects to considering the matter when it is presented.
